Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2350.01
School district or township funds; prorate deposits; when.

When more than one bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution has been designated by the governing body of the school district or township as a depository, the treasurer or ex officio treasurer shall not give a preference but shall prorate deposits in the manner required of county treasurers as provided in section 77-2314. This section shall have no application to certificates of deposit. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1967, c. 508, § 4, p. 1710;

Laws 1973, LB 247, § 1;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 63;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 59.